Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.024

Actions by the commission against a license—Civil fines.

This section governs the assessment of a civil fine against a licensee issued by the commission. This section does not govern actions taken under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(1) The commission shall give written notice to the licensee or its agent against whom it assesses a civil fine. The form, contents, and service of the notice shall comply with this chapter and the procedural rules adopted by the commission.

(2) The civil fine is due and payable 28 days after receipt by the licensee or its agent. The commission may make the date the fine is due later than 28 days after receipt by the licensee or its agent. When the commission does so, it shall state the date the fine is due in the written notice given to the licensee against whom it assesses the fine.

(3) The licensee against whom the commission assesses a civil fine has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The form, contents, and service of the application for an adjudicative hearing must comply with this chapter and the procedural rules adopted by the commission and must be served on and received by the commission within 28 days of the licensee receiving the notice.

[ 2024 c 121 s 32.]